Maryland, session 2026, HB0096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2B–03.
(a) (1) There is a Baltimore County School Board Nominating Commission.
(b) (1) The Commission consists of [19] 21 members who shall be appointed in
accordance with this subsection.
(2) The Commission shall reflect the rich cultural, geographic, ethnic, and
racial diversity of Baltimore County.
(3) The Governor, in consultation with the County Executive of Baltimore
County, shall appoint eight members, one from each legislative district that lies in whole
or in part in Baltimore County.
– 1 –

Ch. 570 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) The County Executive of Baltimore County shall appoint one member
from the county at large.
(5) The following organizations each shall appoint one member:
(i) The Teachers Association of Baltimore County;
(ii) The GREATER Baltimore County Chamber of Commerce;
(iii) The PTA Council of Baltimore County, Inc.;
(iv) Towson University;
(v) The League of Women Voters of Baltimore County;
(vi) The Baltimore County Branch of the National Association for the
Advancement of Colored People;
(vii) The Baltimore County Public Schools’ Special Education
Citizens’ Advisory Committee;
(viii) The Baltimore County Student Councils;
(ix) The Council of Administrative and Supervisory Employees;
[and]
(x) The Education Support Personnel of Baltimore County;
(XI) THE AMERICAN FEDERATION OF STATE, COUNTY AND
MUNICIPAL EMPLOYEES LOCAL 3, COUNCIL 434; AND
(XII) THE CITIZENS ADVISORY COUNCIL FOR GIFTED AND
TALENTED EDUCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the term of the initial member
of the Greater Baltimore County Chamber of Commerce under § 8–2B–03 of the Education
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall serve the remainder of the term of the
member of the Baltimore County Chamber of Commerce, subject to Section 3 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The terms of the following members of the Baltimore County School Board
Nominating Commission shall terminate at the end of September 30, 2028:
(1) each member appointed by:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 570
(i) the Baltimore County Branch of the National Association for the
Advancement of Colored People;
(ii) the Education Support Personnel of Baltimore County;
(iii) the Teachers Association of Baltimore County;
(iv) Towson University;
(v) the League of Women Voters of Baltimore County; and
(vi) the Baltimore County Student Councils; and
(2) the members appointed by the Governor representing:
(i) district 6;
(ii) district 8;
(iii) district 11; and
(iv) district 43.
(b) The terms of the following members of the Baltimore County School Board
Nominating Commission shall terminate at the end of September 30, 2030:
(1) each member appointed by:
(i) the American Federation of State, County and Municipal
Employees Local 3, Council 434;
(ii) the Citizens Advisory Council for Gifted and Talented Education;
(iii) the Greater Baltimore County Chamber of Commerce;
(iv) the PTA Council of Baltimore County, Inc.;
(v) the Baltimore County Public Schools’ Special Education Citizens’
Advisory Committee; and
(vi) the Council of Administrative and Supervisory Employees;
(2) the at–large member appointed by the County Executive of Baltimore
County; and
– 3 –

Ch. 570 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) the members appointed by the Governor representing:
(i) district 7;
(ii) district 10;
(iii) district 42; and
(iv) district 44.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –